Tennessee, session 114, HB1230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-136(b), is amended by deleting
subdivision (2) and substituting:
Upon request of the education committee of the senate or the committee of
house of representatives having jurisdiction over education, the department shall submit
a report to the requesting committee documenting each LEA's and public charter
school's compliance with this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1230
003175
- 1 -